Washington statutes.
RCW 10.04.020

Arrest—Offense committed in view of district judge.

When any offense is committed in view of any district judge, the judge may, by verbal direction to any deputy, or if no deputy is present, to any citizen, cause such deputy or citizen to arrest such offender, and keep such offender in custody for the space of one hour, unless such offender shall sooner be taken from such custody by virtue of a warrant issued on complaint on oath. But such person so arrested, shall not be confined in jail, nor put upon any trial, until arrested by virtue of such warrant.

[ 1987 c 202 s 149; Code 1881 s 1888; Code 1881 s 1889, part; 1873 p 382 s 186; 1854 p 260 s 173; RRS s 1926, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.